Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.417

Annuities and retirement income plans—Rights and duties of faculty or employees with Washington state teachers' retirement system credit—Regional universities and The Evergreen State College.

(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first employed by a higher education institution in a position eligible for participation in an annuity or retirement program under RCW 28B.10.400 prior to July 1, 2011.

(2) A faculty member or other employee exempt from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070 (1)(z) and (2) designated by the board of trustees of the applicable regional university or of The Evergreen State College as being subject to an annuity or retirement income plan and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system, shall retain credit for such service in the Washington state teachers' retirement system and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall leave his or her accumulated contributions in the teachers' retirement fund. Upon his or her attaining eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers' retirement system, such faculty member or other employee shall receive from the Washington state teachers' retirement system a retirement allowance consisting of an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at his or her age when becoming eligible for such retirement and a pension for each year of creditable service established and retained at the time of said designation as provided in RCW 41.32.497. Anyone who on July 1, 1967, was receiving pension payments from the teachers' retirement system based on thirty-five years of creditable service shall thereafter receive a pension based on the total years of creditable service established with the retirement system: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any such faculty member or other employee exempt from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070 (1)(z) and (2) who, upon attainment of eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers' retirement system, is still engaged in public educational employment, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under the Washington state teachers' retirement system until he or she ceases such public educational employment. Any retired faculty member or other employee who enters service in any public educational institution shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such service may be rendered up to seventy-five days in a school year without reduction of pension.

(3) A faculty member or other exempt employee designated by the board of trustees of the applicable regional university or of The Evergreen State College as being subject to the annuity and retirement income plan and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system may, at his or her election and at any time, on and after midnight June 10, 1959, terminate his or her membership in the Washington state teachers' retirement system and withdraw his or her accumulated contributions and interest in the teachers' retirement fund upon written application to the board of trustees of the Washington state teachers' retirement system. Faculty members or other employees who withdraw their accumulated contributions, on and after the date of withdrawal of contributions, shall no longer be members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system and shall forfeit all rights of membership, including pension benefits, theretofore acquired under the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

[ 2015 c 225 s 28; 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 261 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.10.400.